New York, session 2025-2026, S5427.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 4407-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 4407-a. Mandatory early screening and special provisions relating to 4 instruction of children with dyslexia or other phonological differences 5 or disabilities. 1. All school districts shall be required to conduct 6 full and individual screenings in accordance with this section for 7 purposes of early identification, support, intervention and accommo- 8 dation of children with dyslexia. For the purposes of this section, 9 "dyslexia" shall mean dyslexia or any other phonological learning 10 difference or disability. 11 2. Mandatory early screening for dyslexia shall be conducted by each 12 school district using a screening program that is: (a) evidence based 13 with proven psychometrics for validity; (b) efficient and low cost; and 14 (c) readily available. Mandatory early screening shall commence during 15 kindergarten and shall continue thereafter on an annual basis until such 16 child has successfully completed the second grade. 17 3. All school districts shall provide intervention services for any 18 student who is identified as having dyslexia. Such intervention services 19 shall be small group instruction in multi-sensory sequential phonics or 20 another approved curriculum for children identified to be at risk of 21 being dyslexic, which shall be taught in addition to any other instruc- 22 tion. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08866-01-5